Massachusetts, session 194th, H838.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of section 3-8 of article 3 
of the charter of the city of Methuen, or of any other general or special law or ordinance of the 
contrary, the vacancy in the office of the Mayor for the City of Methuen shall be filled at a 
special election called for by the City Council to be held not less than 64 days after the date on 
which the special election is called, but not later than December 14, 2024. 
SECTION 2. The number of signatures of voters required to place the name of a 
candidate on the official ballot to be used at the special election shall be not less than 150. 

of 2 8  SECTION 3. Except as provided for in this act, the nomination of candidates and the 
conduct of the special election held pursuant to this act shall be in accordance with all other 
provisions of the city charter and any other applicable general or special law. No preliminary 
shall be held for the special election authorized in section 1.  
SECTION 4. If this act shall not be in effect as of October 7, 2024, then any action taken 
consistent with this act shall be ratified, validated and confirmed as though this act had been in 
place prior. 
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon its passage.